Hawaii, session 2025, SB1604.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the university of Hawaii for the development of faculty, staff, teacher, and workforce housing at the Kauai community college. SECTION 2. The university of Hawaii shall develop faculty, staff, teacher, and workforce housing at the Kauai community college.  The following tiered system shall be used to determine eligibility for housing: Tier 1:   Kauai community college students who are residents of the State; Tier 2:   Kauai community college faculty and staff; Tier 3:   University of Hawaii faculty and staff; Tier 4:   University of Hawaii students; Tier 5:   Department of education teachers and staff; Tier 6:   Other state employees; Tier 7:   Other county employees; Tier 8:   Healthcare workforce; Tier 9:   Agriculture workforce; Tier 10:  Workforce housing for families earning          per cent of the area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; and Tier 11:  All others. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the development of faculty, staff, teacher, and workforce housing at the Kauai community college. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________